Wyoming, session 2025, SF0012.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 7-3-513 and 35-21-113 are created to
read:

7-3-513. Permanent orders of protection;
requirements; procedures.

SF0012

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0283
(a) The court may, upon petition by a victim or a
person specified in W.S. 7-3-507(a), enter a permanent
order of protection or extend an order previously issued
under W.S. 7-3-508 or 7-3-509 on a permanent basis. A
permanent order of protection shall order the respondent to
refrain from any contact or further acts of stalking or
sexual assault involving the victim or any other person.
Before entering a permanent order of protection under this
section, the court shall:

(i) Consider the respondent's history of
violence, the severity of the offense at issue and any
evidence presented;

(ii) Determine that, to avoid further injury or
harm to the victim, the victim needs permanent protection.

(b) Upon conviction, the court may enter a permanent
order of protection under this section in favor of the
victim against a person convicted of a violent felony as
defined by W.S. 6-1-104(a)(xii).

SF0012

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0283
(c) The court may, in any permanent order of
protection, specify any of the directions or conditions
specified in W.S. 7-3-509(a).

(d) A permanent order of protection shall include the
notice required under W.S. 7-3-509(b). A hearing shall be
held before a permanent order of protection is entered,
provided that the petitioner or another party to the
hearing may petition the court to appear remotely as
provided by W.S. 7-3-507(f).

(e) A permanent order of protection issued under this
section may be terminated upon the victim's request that
the order be dismissed or upon motion by the respondent and
upon good cause shown by the respondent.

35-21-113. Permanent orders of protection;
requirements; procedures.

(a) The court may, upon petition by a victim or a
person specified in W.S. 35-21-103(a), enter a permanent
order of protection or extend an order previously issued
under W.S. 35-21-103 or 35-21-104 on a permanent basis. A
SF0012

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0283
permanent order of protection shall order the respondent
household member to refrain from having contact with or
abusing the petitioner or any other household member.
Before entering a permanent order of protection under this
section, the court shall:

(i) Consider the respondent's history of
violence, the severity of the offense at issue and any
evidence presented;

(ii) Determine that, to avoid further injury or
harm to the victim, the victim needs permanent protection.

(b) Upon conviction, the court may enter a permanent
order of protection under this section in favor of the
victim against a person convicted of a violent felony as
defined by W.S. 6-1-104(a)(xii).

(c) In any permanent order of protection, the court:

(i) May specify any of the directions or
conditions specified in W.S. 35-21-105(a);

SF0012

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0283
(ii) Shall order any of the conditions or
requirements specified in W.S. 35-21-105(b) in accordance
with W.S. 35-21-105(b).

(d) A permanent order of protection shall include the
notice required under W.S. 35-21-105(c). A hearing shall be
held before a permanent order of protection is entered,
provided that the petitioner or another party to the
hearing may petition the court to appear remotely as
provided by W.S. 35-21-103(j).

(e) A permanent order of protection issued under this
section may be terminated upon the victim's request that
the order be dismissed or upon motion by the respondent and
upon good cause shown by the respondent.

Section 2. W.S. 7-3-506(a)(intro), 7-3-507(f),
7-3-509(a)(intro) and (c), 7-3-510, 7-3-511(b)(i), (ii) and
(c), 7-3-512, 35-21-102(a)(viii) and 35-21-106(b) and (c)
is amended to read:

7-3-506. Definitions.

SF0012

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0283
(a) As used in W.S. 7-3-506 through 7-3-512 7-3-513:

7-3-507. Petition for order of protection; contents;
requisites; indigent petitioners; remote appearance at
hearings.

(f) For any hearing required or authorized for
proceedings under W.S. 7-3-506 through 7-3-512 7-3-513, the
petitioner or other party to the hearing may petition the
court to appear at the hearing by remote means. The court
may, in its discretion, grant the petition for remote
appearance at the hearing, provided that the court is
equipped with appropriate audio or video technology to
allow the petitioner or other party to fully participate in
the hearing.

7-3-509. Order of protection; contents; remedies;
order not to affect title to property.

(a) Following a hearing under W.S. 7-3-508(a) and
upon a finding that conduct constituting stalking or sexual
assault has been committed, the court shall enter an order
of protection ordering the respondent to refrain from any
SF0012

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0283
further acts of stalking or sexual assault involving the
victim or any other person. As a part of any order of
protection issued under this section or W.S. 7-3-513, the
court may direct that the respondent:

(c) A request by the victim for the perpetrator to
violate an order of protection issued under this section, a
permanent order of protection issued under W.S. 7-3-513 or
a temporary order of protection issued under W.S. 7-3-508
shall constitute an affirmative defense to a charge of
violation of the order by the perpetrator.

7-3-510. Service of order; duration and extension of
order; violation; remedies not exclusive.

(a) An order of protection granted under W.S. 7-3-509
or 7-3-513 shall be served upon the respondent pursuant to
the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure. A copy of the order
of protection shall be filed with the sheriff of the
county.

(b) Except as otherwise provided by this subsection
and W.S. 7-3-513, an order of protection granted by the
SF0012

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0283
court under W.S. 7-3-509 shall be effective for a fixed
period of time not to exceed three (3) years. Either party
may move to modify, terminate or extend the order. The
order may be extended repetitively upon a showing of good
cause for additional periods of time, not to exceed three
(3) years each, if the court finds from specific facts that
a clear and present danger to the victim continues to
exist. If a party subject to an order of protection is
sentenced and incarcerated or becomes imprisoned, the
running of the time remaining for the order of protection
shall be tolled during the term of incarceration or
imprisonment. The conditions and provisions of an order of
protection shall remain in effect during any period of
tolling under this subsection. Upon release from
incarceration or imprisonment the effective period of the
order of protection shall be the amount of time remaining
as of the first day of the term of incarceration or
imprisonment or one (1) year from the date of release,
whichever is greater.

(c) Willful violation of a temporary order of
protection issued under W.S. 7-3-508, of a permanent order
of protection issued under W.S. 7-3-513 or of an order of
SF0012

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0283
protection issued under W.S. 7-3-509 is a misdemeanor
punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6)
months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars
($750.00), or both. A temporary order of protection issued
under W.S. 7-3-508, a permanent order of protection issued
under W.S. 7-3-513 and an order of protection issued under
W.S. 7-3-509 shall have statewide applicability and a
criminal prosecution under this subsection may be commenced
in any county in which the respondent commits an act in
violation of the order.

(d) The remedies provided by W.S. 7-3-506 through
7-3-512 7-3-513 are in addition to any other civil or
criminal remedy available under the law.

7-3-511. Emergency assistance by law enforcement
officers; limited liability.

(b) A law enforcement officer or agency responding to
the request for assistance may take whatever steps are
reasonably necessary to protect the victim, including:

SF0012

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0283
(i) Advising the victim of the remedies
available under W.S. 7-3-506 through 7-3-512 7-3-513 and
the availability of shelter, medical care, counseling,
safety planning, victim's rights counseling and other
services;

(ii) Advising the victim, when appropriate, of
the procedure for initiating proceedings under W.S. 7-3-506
through 7-3-512 7-3-513 or criminal proceedings and the
importance of preserving evidence; and

(c) Any law enforcement agency or officer responding
to a request for assistance under W.S. 7-3-506 through
7-3-512 7-3-513 is immune from civil liability when
complying with the request, provided that the agency or
officer acts in good faith and in a reasonable manner.

7-3-512. Confidentiality in court proceedings.

The court shall enter an order providing for the
confidentiality of the name, address, city and state of
residence or any other information identifying residence of
SF0012

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0283
all parties involved in the sexual assault for all orders
issued under W.S. 7-3-508, and 7-3-509 and 7-3-513.

35-21-102. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(viii) "This act" means W.S. 35-21-101 through
35-21-111 35-21-113.

35-21-106. Service of order; duration and extension
of order; violation; remedies not exclusive.

(b) Except as otherwise provided by this subsection
and W.S. 35-21-113, an order of protection granted by the
court under W.S. 35-21-105 shall be effective for a fixed
period of time not to exceed three (3) years. Either party
may move to modify, terminate or extend the order. The
order may be extended repetitively upon a showing of good
cause for additional periods of time not to exceed three
(3) years each. If a party subject to an order of
protection is sentenced and incarcerated or becomes
imprisoned the running of the time remaining for the order
SF0012

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0283
of protection shall be tolled during the term of
incarceration or imprisonment. The conditions and
provisions of an order of protection shall remain in effect
during any period of tolling under this subsection. Upon
release from incarceration or imprisonment the effective
period of the order of protection shall be the amount of
time remaining as of the first day of the term of
incarceration or imprisonment or one (1) year from the date
of release, whichever is greater. The filing of an action
for divorce shall not supersede an order of protection
granted under this act.

(c) Willful violation of an order of protection
granted under this act is a crime as defined by W.S.
6-4-404. An order of protection granted under this act has
statewide applicability and a criminal prosecution under
this subsection may be commenced in any county in which the
respondent commits an act in violation of the order of
protection.

Section 3.

SF0012

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0283
(a) Nothing in this act shall be construed to alter,
amend or abrogate any order of protection entered or
granted before July 1, 2025.

(b) Orders of protection that are tolled under the
provisions of W.S. 7-3-510(b) or 35-21-106(b) on July 1,
2025 shall be tolled and shall have their duration
calculated in accordance with W.S. 7-3-510(b) or
35-21-106(b) as those provisions existed on June 30, 2025.

Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0012